Washington statutes.
RCW 11.106.080

Effect of decree.

The decree rendered under RCW 11.106.070 shall be deemed final, conclusive, and binding upon all the parties interested including all incompetent, unborn, and unascertained beneficiaries of the trust subject only to the right of appeal under RCW 11.106.090.

[ 1985 c 30 s 102. Prior: 1984 c 149 s 135; 1955 c 33 s 30.30.080; prior: 1951 c 226 s 8. Formerly RCW 30.30.080.]

NOTES:

Short title—Application—Purpose—Severability—1985 c 30: See RCW 11.02.900 through 11.02.903.

Severability—Effective dates—1984 c 149: See notes following RCW 11.02.005.